Utah statutes.
13-22-14.   Accuracy not guaranteed.

(1)  By issuing a permit, the state does not guarantee the accuracy of any representation contained in the permit, nor does it warrant that any statement made by the holder of the permit is truthful.  The state makes no certification as to the charitable worthiness of any organization on whose behalf a solicitation is made nor as to the moral character of the holder of the permit.

(2)  The following statement shall appear on each permit: "THE STATE OF UTAH MAKES NO CERTIFICATION AS TO THE CHARITABLE WORTHINESS OF ANY ORGANIZATION ON WHOSE BEHALF A SOLICITATION IS MADE NOR AS TO THE MORAL CHARACTER OF THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT."

(3)  No solicitation for charitable purposes shall use the fact or requirement of registration or of the filing of any report with the division pursuant to this chapter with the intent to cause or in a manner tending to cause any person to believe that the solicitation, the manner in which it is conducted, its purposes, any use to which the proceeds will be applied or the person or organization conducting it has been or will be in any way endorsed, sanctioned, or approved by the division or any governmental agency or office.



Amended by Chapter 210, 2001 General Session

